Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-351
Insurance companies; similar names; use prohibited.

No company, association, or society organized under sections 44-202 to 44-208.08 shall take any name in use by any other company, association, or society or so closely resembling such name as to mislead the public as to its identity.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 73, p. 424;

R.S.1913, § 3209;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 43, p. 604;

C.S.1922, § 7808;

C.S.1929, § 44-343;

R.S.1943, § 44-351;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 101.

Grand Lodge of one state may be enjoined from transacting insurance business in another state to injury of Grand Lodge of that state. Grand Lodge, A. O. U. W. v. Grand Lodge, A. O. U. W., 106 Neb. 12, 182 N.W. 510 (1921).

Question of similarity of names is judicial question. Grand Lodge, A. O. U. W. v. Insurance Board, 103 Neb. 99, 170 N.W. 617 (1919).

If name or title of beneficiary insurance company contains a descriptive word by which it is generally known to public, to incorporate that word as the characteristic word in the name of a proposed new company would have a tendency to mislead the public. Knights of Maccabees of the World v. Searle, 75 Neb. 285, 106 N.W. 448 (1905).